Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.560

Official controls—Forms of controls.

Official controls may include:

(1) Maps showing the exact boundaries of zones within each of which separate controls over the type and degree of permissible land uses are defined;

(2) Maps for streets showing the exact alignment, gradients, dimensions and other pertinent features, and including specific controls with reference to protecting such accurately defined future rights-of-way against encroachment by buildings, other physical structures or facilities;

(3) Maps for other public facilities, such as parks, playgrounds, civic centers, etc., showing exact location, size, boundaries and other related features, including appropriate regulations protecting such future sites against encroachment by buildings and other physical structures or facilities;

(4) Specific regulations and controls pertaining to other subjects incorporated in the comprehensive plan or establishing standards and procedures to be employed in land development including, but not limited to, subdividing of land and the approval of land plats and the preservation of streets and lands for other public purposes requiring future dedication or acquisition and general design of physical improvements, and the encouragement and protection of access to direct sunlight for solar energy systems.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 170 s 11; 1963 c 4 s 36.70.560. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 56.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 170: See note following RCW 64.04.140.

"Solar energy system" defined: RCW 36.70.025.